California, session 20252026, AB2184.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) Assembly Bill 1757 of the 2021–22 Regular Session (Chapter 341 of the Statutes of 2022) (AB 1757) added Section 38561.5 to the Health and Safety Code (Section 38561.5). Section 38561.5 requires the state to adopt ambitious targets for carbon removal and greenhouse gas reduction on natural and working natural, working, and urban lands and to center nature-based climate solutions, as defined in that section, in California’s climate mitigation and resilience efforts in accordance with the best available science.(b) In establishing statewide nature-based climate solution targets pursuant to AB 1757, the state set specific targets across California’s major land types, including forests; shrublands and chaparral; grasslands; croplands; developed lands; wetlands and seagrasses; and sparsely vegetated lands, to ensure that every landscape contributes to achieving carbon neutrality and building climate resilience. Nature-based solutions produce powerful cobenefits for local communities by creating jobs, increasing affordability, and supporting public health and resiliency to extreme events, including wildfire, floods, heat, and drought.(b)(c) Section 38561.5 requires required the Natural Resources Agency, the State Air Resources Board, the California Environmental Protection Agency, the Department of Food and Agriculture, an expert advisory committee, as specified, and other state agencies, as provided, to collaborate in developing nature-based climate solution targets for 2030, 2038, and 2045 that contribute to California’s goals of achieving carbon neutrality no later than 2045 and protecting Californians from the climate crisis.(d) The state has also established targets for sustainable agricultural practices, including a target established in 2016 to reduce manure-based methane by 40 percent below 2013 levels, and a target in the 2022 Scoping Plan produced by the State Air Resources Board to electrify 75 percent of agricultural energy used by 2045.(c)(e) Cumulative scientific, policy, and fiscal commitments described in these findings demonstrate the State of California’s compelling interest in urgently scaling nature-based climate solutions and sustainable agricultural practices on natural, working, and urban lands to protect communities, strengthen natural systems, and achieve California’s climate resilience and carbon neutrality objectives.(d)(f) Nature-based climate solutions and sustainable agricultural practices are essential strategies that utilize natural systems and working lands to reduce greenhouse gas emissions, enhance carbon sequestration, and strengthen the resilience of California’s communities and ecosystems.(e)(g) Accelerating the implementation of nature-based climate solutions and sustainable agricultural practices on natural, working, and urban lands is necessary to achieve California’s statutory climate change goals, including achieving carbon neutrality no later than 2045 and preparing communities for escalating climate-driven extremes.(h) The costs of climate change to California’s natural, working, and urban lands are increasing and will continue to increase until California and the world achieve carbon neutrality. Recent examples of these costs include:(1) The 2025 Los Angeles wildfires resulted in more than $250,000,000,000 in total economic losses.(2) The cost of failing to address sea level rise by 2050 in the San Francisco Bay area alone is estimated at over $230,000,000,000.(3) Over the course of seven extreme heat events from 2013 to 2022, inclusive, nearly the entire population of California was impacted and these events resulted in a cumulative cost of $7,7000,000,000. These seven extreme heat events resulted in 460 deaths, 344 adverse birth outcomes, 5,000 hospitalizations, 10,600 emergency department visits, and 138,000 outpatient visits.(4) Each extreme heat event resulted in $7,700,000 to $210,000,000 in lost work time.(5) Scientists estimate that drought could result in $3,000,000,000 in economic losses annually in California agriculture.(6) The total economic impact of the 2022 drought on California agriculture equaled $2,000,000,000.(7) The 2021 drought increased pumping costs for California farmers and ranchers by $184,000,000.(8) Total California crop loss estimates for the 2023 floods were $270,000,000, and total economic damages were estimated at $5,000,000,000 to $7,000,000,000 for the January 2023 storms alone. Annualized flood damages in the San Joaquin Valley are anticipated to roughly double to approximately $650,000,000 per year by 2040 due to climate change-driven alterations of current precipitation and hydrologic patterns.(9) As a result of these impacts, California is losing farms and ranches at an unprecedented rate, including 7,387 farms lost between 2017 and 2022, equal to 10 percent of farms in California, according to the United States Department of Agriculture Census of Agriculture.(f)(i) Nature-based climate solutions and sustainable agricultural practices harness the power of natural and working natural, working, and urban lands to protect communities from wildfire, drought, extreme heat, flooding, sea-level sea level rise, food insecurity and price shocks, and other climate-driven hazards while simultaneously removing carbon from the atmosphere and supporting biodiversity.(g)(j) California’s state leaders recognize that scaling up nature-based climate solutions and sustainable agricultural practices is indispensable to meeting the state’s core climate, resilience, public health, and environmental equity objectives.(h)(k) In 2022, the state released the Natural and Working Lands Climate Smart Strategy, which identifies priority nature-based climate solutions and sustainable agricultural practices across the state’s diverse landscapes and provides a comprehensive framework to guide state programs and investments toward maximizing climate benefits.(i)(l) California formally integrated the Natural and Working Lands Climate Smart Strategy into the 2022 Scoping Plan for Achieving Carbon Neutrality, ensuring that nature-based climate solutions and sustainable agricultural practices are fully embedded in California’s long-term climate planning.(j)(m) The 2021 California Climate Adaptation Strategy identified accelerating nature-based climate solutions and strengthening the resilience of natural systems as one of six priority “north stars” guiding climate adaptation policy and investment.(k)(n) The state has built new partnerships with national and international leaders—including China, Australia, Canada, and South Africa—to advance shared nature-based climate solution and sustainable agricultural practices goals and accelerate the development and exchange of best practices.(l) In establishing statewide nature-based climate solution targets pursuant to AB 1757, the state set specific targets across California’s major land types—including forests; shrublands and chaparral; grasslands; croplands; developed lands; wetlands and seagrasses; and sparsely vegetated lands—to ensure that every landscape contributes to achieving carbon neutrality and building climate resilience.(m)(o) The reauthorization of the California Cap-and-Invest Program pursuant to Assembly Bill 1207 of the 2025–26 Regular Session (Chapter 117 of the Statutes of 2025) (AB 1207) identified, only until January 1, 2046, added nature-based climate solutions as a priority area and maintained sustainable agricultural practices as priority areas for funding by the California Cap-and-Invest Program, reaffirming the state’s commitment to accelerating climate-smart investments.(n)Nature-based climate solutions are the only priorities included in the California Cap-and-Invest Program pursuant to AB 1757 and AB 1207, that(p) Of the 81 targets identified by the Natural Resources Agency in the 2024 nature-based solutions climate targets, only targets under “Wildfire Risk Reduction,” such as prescribed fire and fuel reduction projects, receive continuous funding through Senate Bill 840 (Chapter 121, Statutes of 2025) (SB 840). The rest of the nature-based climate solutions and sustainable agricultural practices that are included in the California Cap-and-Invest Program pursuant to AB 1757 and AB 1207 do not currently receive a continuous appropriation, appropriations in SB 840 to achieve the targets set in 2024 by the Natural Resources Agency with the Department of Food and Agriculture and the State Air Resources Board, as required by Section 38561.5, demonstrating the need for the Legislature to establish a steady and reliable funding stream to support the sustained implementation of nature-based climate solutions. solutions and sustainable agricultural practices.(q) Nature-based climate solutions and sustainable agricultural practices may result in significant cost savings for California and Californians in the face of rapidly worsening climate change and land use change, including, for example, the following:(1) The 177,300,000 urban trees in California save residents an estimated $485,800,000 annually in air conditioning costs, helping to increase affordability in California.(2) A 2017 study conducted in the County of Sonoma found that the total ecosystem services of grasslands, such as carbon sequestration, water quality, and pollination, totaled approximately $2,400,000,000 per year.(3) California wetlands provide habitat for plants and animals, recreational opportunities, and cultural value to local residents. In total, California wetlands have an annual economic value of $6,3000,000,000 to $22,900,000,000.(4) A study conducted in the Mojave Desert found that desert conservation resulted in $23,700,000 in saved health care costs for the Counties of Imperial, San Bernardino, Riverside, and Inyo due to decreased exposure to particulate matter.(r) For purposes of this section, “nature-based climate solutions” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 38561.5.SEC. 2. (a) After the amounts specified in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 39719 of, and Section 39719.4 of, the Health and Safety Code, are fully allocated as determined by the Department of Finance, the remaining moneys in the fund, up to three hundred million dollars ($300,000,000), are the sum of two hundred fifty million dollars ($250,000,000) is hereby appropriated from the Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund in the annual Budget Act each fiscal year from the 2027–2028 through the 2045–46 fiscal year, inclusive, to achieve nature-based climate solutions, solutions on natural, working, and urban lands pursuant to targets set in 2024 by the Natural Resources Agency with the Department of Food and Agriculture and State Air Resources Board, as required by Section 38561.5 of the Health and Safety Code, as follows:(1) The sum of one hundred fifty million dollars ($150,000,000) shall be allocated to the Natural Resources Agency to fund nature-based climate solutions. solutions necessary to achieve targets set in 2024 by the Natural Resources Agency with the Department of Food and Agriculture and State Air Resources Board, as required by Section 38561.5 of the Health and Safety Code, to reduce greenhouse gas emissions, and to draw down and store carbon dioxide from the atmosphere in soils and biomass while also protecting wildlife habitat, enhancing biodiversity, and increasing clean air, water, and food security.(2)Not less than fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) shall be allocated to the Department of Food and Agriculture to fund nature-based climate solutions in croplands and grasslands, including, but not limited to, healthy soils practices and conversion of conventional to organic systems.(3)Any amount remaining after allocating the amounts described in paragraphs (1) and (2) shall be allocated for nature-based climate solutions at the discretion of the Legislature.(2) The sum of one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) shall be allocated for nature-based climate solutions at the discretion of the Legislature to achieve the targets set in 2024 by the Natural Resources Agency with the Department of Food and Agriculture and State Air Resources Board, as required by Section 38561.5 of the Health and Safety Code.(b) For purposes of this section, “nature-based climate solutions” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 38561.5 of the Health and Safety Code.SEC. 3. (a) After the amounts specified in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 39719 of, and Section 39719.4 of, the Health and Safety Code, are fully allocated as determined by the Department of Finance, the sum of one hundred fifty million dollars ($150,000,000) is hereby appropriated from the Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund in the annual Budget Act each fiscal year from the 2027–28 to the 2045–46 fiscal year, inclusive, to the Department of Food and Agriculture to fund sustainable agricultural practices and nature-based climate solutions, as defined in Section 38561.5 of the Health and Safety Code, that reduce methane, nitrous oxide, and carbon dioxide emissions and input costs for farmers, increase carbon sequestration and climate resilience, improve water quality, air quality, and other environmental and public health benefits, and maintain food security and affordability, including the following categories of solutions:(1) Multibenefit manure management systems that reduce methane emissions and water use, improve water quality, and increase compost production and soil health.(2) Solar-powered, electric, and high-efficiency irrigation systems that reduce nitrous oxide and carbon dioxide emissions and energy use, and improve water use efficiency, water quality, and air quality.(3) Healthy soils practices and organic systems that reduce nitrous oxide emissions, soil carbon loss, fertilizer and pesticide use, and dust, and increase carbon sequestration, water infiltration and retention, drought and flood resilience, and biodiversity to achieve the targets set in 2024 by the Natural Resources Agency with the Department of Food and Agriculture and the State Air Resources Board, as required by Section 38561.5 of the Health and Safety Code.(b) The department may use up to 10 percent of the total allocated funding for this section for technical assistance, as defined in Section 570 of the Food and Agricultural Code, to support the solutions described in this section.(c) For purposes of this section, “nature-based climate solutions” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 38561.5 of the Health and Safety Code.SEC. 4. If, for any fiscal year, the Department of Finance determines that, after fully allocating the amounts pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 39719 of, and Section 39719.4 of, the Health and Safety Code, there are insufficient annual proceeds to fully provide for the appropriations specified in Sections 2 and 3 of this act, the allocated funds shall be proportionally allocated in alignment with this bill among paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 2 of this act and Section 3 of this act if paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 2 of this act and Section 3 of this act are not fully funded, in addition to any state operations costs appropriated in the annual Budget Act.SEC. 5. (a) For purposes of Sections 2 and 3 of this act, funded nature-based climate solutions and sustainable agricultural practices shall maximize cobenefits to the greatest degree possible, including, but not limited to: lower utility bills, lower insurance premiums, water quality, air quality, lower health care costs, lower utility bills, food security, water conservation, flood risk reduction, carbon sequestration, groundwater recharge, access to recreational opportunities, increased access and opportunity for tribal cultural practices, increase in tourism, habitat for wildlife, decreased wildlife vehicle crashes, and reduction of risk of and resilience to natural disasters, including wildfire, floods, drought, and extreme heat.(b) All nature-based climate solutions and sustainable agricultural practices undertaken to achieve carbon neutrality seek to maximize cobenefits, particularly in low-income and disadvantaged communities.(c) For purposes of this section, “nature-based climate solutions” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 38561.5 of the Health and Safety Code.